District of Columbia statutes.
20-527

Termination; change in proceeding.

Upon a timely request for standard probate, a personal representative previously appointed shall have only the powers and duties of a special administrator until the appointment of a personal representative in the standard probate proceeding, subject to any order in the standard probate proceeding. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the reappointment of a person who was previously appointed in an abbreviated probate proceeding or a small estates proceeding.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
This section is referenced in § 20-725.
1981 Ed., § 20-527.